Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-509
Speech-language pathologist, defined.

Speech-language pathologist means an individual who presents himself or herself to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words speech-language pathologist, speech therapist, speech correctionist, speech clinician, language pathologist, language therapist, language clinician, logopedist, communicologist, aphasiologist, aphasia therapist, voice pathologist, voice therapist, voice clinician, phoniatrist, or any similar title, term, or description of services.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 194.